Wyoming statutes. Title 27 Labor and Employment
Article 8. Administrative Provisions

§ 27-14-801.
Duties of director.

through (c) Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

The director may provide for the investigation of facts and circumstances regarding any claim filed under this act. To carry out investigations, he may acquire the services of one (1) or more physicians licensed to practice medicine in this state to serve as medical consultants in investigating any injury or death resulting from injury, the treatment of any injury or death or the recovery of any employee which is reported to the division. The physician shall be paid on a fee for service basis from the worker’s compensation account. The director may also employ consultants to review medical and hospital bills submitted to the division.

The director shall:

Repealed by Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 2.

Periodically provide for educational programs for and consult with employee groups, employers, hospital administrators and health care providers;

Report to the appropriate professional or facility licensing authority any suspected substandard or inappropriate medical or health care provided to an injured worker by the provider or health care facility;

Provide information and guidance to employers and employees as provided by W.S. 9-2-2602(b)(viii).

Any duties designated by statute upon the director may be performed by his designee.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1990, ch. 63, § 3; 1996, ch. 82, § 2; 2012, ch. 48, § 1; 2022 ch. 26, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, added (e)(iii).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added (e)(iv).

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Reliance on reviewing physicians. —

Although reviewing physicians had not personally examined or treated claimant, hearing examiner did not err in crediting their definitive opinions over treating physician's equivocal testimony. Burns v. State ex rel. Wyoming Workers' Compensation Div., 4 P.3d 924,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

Pohl v. Bailey Co., 980 P.2d 816,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 1999).

§ 27-14-802.
Rulemaking power; fees; state's average wages; vocational rehabilitation; contracts with clerks of district court.

The director may adopt rules and regulations for administration of this act. The director shall by rule and regulation establish criteria for qualification of resident and nonresident employers, provide for advance payments of employer premiums under W.S. 27-14-202(e), provide fee schedules for all medical and hospital care rendered injured employees and for the establishment of the state’s average monthly wage. In addition, the division may by rule and regulation establish a separate fee schedule for surgical procedures and hospital admissions preauthorized by the division. Changes in any rule or regulation adopted under this subsection shall be considered only at quarterly intervals.

Before the last day of each quarter in each year, the department shall estimate the average monthly and weekly wage for the twelve (12) months preceding the quarter, based on unemployment insurance commission information and other available statistics.

The division, together with the division of vocational rehabilitation within the department of workforce services, shall jointly establish consistent rules and regulations for the implementation of W.S.

27-14-408

.

The division may contract with the clerks of district court on a county by county basis, for compensation mutually agreed upon, to perform the following functions:

Technical assistance to employers, employees, health care providers and other interested parties in complying with the requirements of this act and interacting with the worker’s compensation system;

Providing necessary forms to employers, employees health care providers and other interested parties;

Responding to inquiries on the status of particular cases;

Obtaining documents including confidential documents, concerning individual cases and transmitting these documents to authorized persons;

Retention and storage of records prior to January 1, 1997; and

Any other administrative function useful in the management of the worker’s compensation program.

Compensation negotiated pursuant to subsection (d) of this section shall be paid from the worker’s compensation account and the agreement may be modified at any time by mutual consent of the parties or may be terminated by either party following notice specified in the agreement.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1989, ch. 29, § 1; ch. 30, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1994, ch. 86, § 2; 1996, ch. 82, § 1; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 100, § 3.

Editor's Notes. —

Laws 1996, ch. 82, § 4, provides: “Except as provided by W.S. 27-14-802(d) and (e) as amended under Section 1 of this act, effective January 1, 1997, all duties and responsibilities of the clerks of district court under the Wyoming Worker's Compensation Act shall be transferred to the worker's compensation division within the department of employment. The division shall identify and notify the clerks of court of those active worker's compensation case files to be transferred to the division. All other worker's compensation case files shall be retained by the clerks of court in accordance with file retention policies in effect for other district court cases.”

“Department,” as used in subsection (b), apparently means the Wyoming department of employment. See §

9-2-2002

.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

Authority For Internal Hearing Unit. —

This section, along with §§

16-3-102

and

16-3-112

vested the Division of Workers' Safety and Compensation with authority to form the Internal Hearing Unit comprised of members of the agency. Poll v. State ex rel. Department of Empl., Div. of Workers' Safety & Compensation, 963 P.2d 977,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 99

(Wyo. 1998).

Internal Hearing Unit properly formed. —

The Division of Workers Safety and Compensation was authorized to promulgate rules and regulations relating to the resolution of contested matters that are not required to be heard by the Medical Commission or the Office of Administrative Hearings, including agency review of claimed late filings, and had ample authority to form the Internal Hearing Unit. Sheneman v. Division of Workers' Safety & Comp. Internal Hearing Unit, 956 P.2d 344,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 50

(Wyo. 1998).

§ 27-14-803.
Investigatory powers; examination of employer's records; subpoenas.

In addition to W.S. 27-14-801(d) and if the administrator has reason to believe that an employee, employer, health care provider or any representative thereof has engaged in any activity in violation of this act, he shall make an investigation to determine if this act has been violated and, to the extent necessary for this purpose, may conduct discovery pursuant to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure.

The administrator may examine the books, accounts, payrolls or business operation of any employer to secure any information necessary for any investigation conducted under this section and for the administration of this act at any reasonable time on twenty-four (24) hours notice but excluding Sundays and holidays unless waived by the employer, either in person or through any authorized inspector, agent or deputy.

If records necessary for an investigation under this section are located outside this state, the person being investigated shall:

Make them available to the administrator at a convenient location within this state;

Pay the reasonable and necessary expenses for the administrator or his representative to examine them at the location at which maintained; or

Provide access to comparable officials of the state in which the records are located for inspection as the administrator may require.

If the employer, employee, health care provider or any representative thereof refuses to cooperate and assist discovery by the administrator pursuant to this section, the attorney general may, at the request of the administrator and upon reasonable notice to all parties, apply to the district court for a subpoena or for an order compelling compliance.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1993, ch. 35, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

§ 27-14-804.
Statistical compilation; annual report and projection; additional reporting requirements.

The director shall:

Secure and compile statistical information concerning injuries occurring in employment, showing the number of injuries or fatalities occurring in the employment and any other information relevant to the proper operation or administration of this law;

Report to the governor as provided by W.S.

9-2-1014

;

Annually prepare and present to the governor and the legislature projections of income, expenditures and account balances for the succeeding twelve (12) month period;

Annually report to the legislature on recommendations for improvement to the initial claims processing and determination process and the effectiveness of the process.

Repealed by Laws 1990, ch. 63, § 3.

History.

Laws 1986, Sp. Sess., ch. 3, § 3; 1990, ch. 63, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 231, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “account balances” for “fund balances” in (a)(iii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2005, ch. 231, § 3, provides: “The provisions of this act shall supersede the provisions of any other bill enacted into law during the 2005 general session which amends or references accounts or funds to the extent any other enactment is inconsistent with the establishment of the funds and accounts created under this act. The state auditor shall account for any fund or account created in any other legislation enacted in the 2005 general session in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) as promulgated by the governmental accounting standards board (GASB) and in accordance with this act.”

§ 27-14-805.
Confidentiality of information; unlawful disclosure; exception.

Except as otherwise provided by this act, information obtained from any employer or covered employee pursuant to reporting requirements under this act or investigations conducted under W.S.

27-14-803

shall not be disclosed in a manner which reveals the identity of the employer or employee except to the employer, the employee, legal counsel for an employer, legal counsel for an employee or in situations necessary for the division to enforce any of the provisions of this act. The confidentiality limitations of this section do not apply to transfers of information between the divisions of the department of workforce services so long as the transfer of information is not restricted by federal law, rule or contract. In addition, nothing in this section shall prohibit the division from:

Disclosing information obtained from employers and employees under this act and any determination of benefit rights to any state or federal agency as required under regulation of the United States department of health and human services and the state department of health, the United States internal revenue service in administering federal tax laws and to the office of the United States bankruptcy trustee;

Allowing access to information obtained pursuant to the administration of this act to a law enforcement authority of the federal government or this state, upon a written request from that authority stating the information is necessary in connection with a criminal investigation;

Allowing access by the state auditor to certain information obtained under this act limited to name, address, social security identification number and other general information pertaining to benefit entitlements and employers;

Reporting to the appropriate professional or facility licensing authority any suspected substandard or inappropriate medical or health care provided to an injured worker by a health care provider or health care facility.

Any employee who discloses information outside of the department in violation of federal or state law may be terminated without progressive discipline.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section and any other provision of law to the contrary, and for purposes of ensuring any medical or disability benefit payment under this act does not duplicate any benefit payment made by another state agency, insurer, group health plan, third party administrator, health maintenance organization or similar entity, the department may upon request of the state agency, insurer or similar entity, disclose information limited to a recipient’s name, social security number, amount of benefit payment, charge for services, date of services and services rendered relating to the benefit payment made under this act. A state agency, insurer, group health plan, third party administrator, health maintenance organization or similar entity shall, upon request of the department, disclose the same limited information to the department. Information received under this subsection shall be used only for the purpose authorized by this subsection and shall otherwise be confidential and the recipient entity shall be subject to the confidentiality restrictions imposed by law upon information received to the extent required of the department. Any violation of this subsection is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both.

Prior to receipt of any benefit under this act, the department shall require an injured employee covered under this act to sign a waiver authorizing the release of information limited to benefit payment information to state agencies, insurers, group health plans, third party administrators, health maintenance organizations or similar entities for purposes specified by subsection (c) of this section.

History.

Laws 1989, ch. 264, § 1; 1990, ch. 63, § 2; 1993, ch. 28, § 1; ch. 35, § 1; 1995, ch. 145, § 1; 2012, ch. 1, § 1; ch. 48, § 1.

The 2012 amendments. —

The first
2012 amendment, by ch. 1, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “workforce services” for “employment” in the introductory language of (a).

The second 2012 amendment, by ch. 48, § 1, effective July 1, 2012, added (a)(iv).

While neither
amendment gave effect to the other, both have been given effect in
this section as set out above.

Meaning of “this act.” —

See note under same catchline following §

27-14-101

.

§ 27-14-806.
Experience rating manipulation; penalties.

A person who knowingly, or with deliberate ignorance or reckless disregard of the true facts or the requirements of this act, violates or attempts to violate the requirements of W.S.

27-14-207

or any other provision of this act related to determining the assignment of a premium rate, or who advises another to violate the requirements of W.S.

27-14-207

or any other provision of this act related to determining the assignment of a premium rate, shall be subject to the following penalties:

A person who is an employer shall be assigned, for the rate year during which the noncompliance or misrepresentation occurred and for the following three (3) rate years, the highest base rate within the industry classification assigned during that year under the division’s rate filing. If the person’s business is already at the highest rate for any year, or if the amount of increase in the person’s rate would be less than two percent (2%) for that year, then a penalty rate of two percent (2%) shall be imposed for that year. This penalty may exceed the maximum assignable rate;

In addition to the penalty imposed pursuant to paragraph (i) of this subsection, any violation or attempted violation of W.S. 27-14-207 or any other provision of this act related to determining the assignment of a premium rate may be prosecuted as a felony punishable by a fine of not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000.00), imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, or both.

History.

Laws 2005, ch. 185, § 1.

Effective dates. —

Laws 2005, ch. 185, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2005.

Cited in

Collins v. COP Wyo., LLC, 2016 WY 18, 2016 Wyo. LEXIS
18 (Feb. 10, 2016).